Maine, session 132, LD349.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 21-A MRSA §121-A, as amended by PL 2023, c. 291, §2 and affected by
§4, is further amended to read:
§121-A. Deadline for registration
The deadline for receipt of voter registration applications submitted by mail or by a 3rd
person is the close of business on the 21st day before election day. The deadline for receipt
of voter registration applications submitted online is midnight on the 21st day before
election day. The deadline for receipt of voter registration applications transmitted by the
Department of the Secretary of State, Bureau of Motor Vehicles pursuant to section 232 or
by a source agency other than the Bureau of Motor Vehicles pursuant to section 233 is
midnight on the 7th day before election day. The deadline for in-person registration is the
close of the polls on business on the last Thursday before election day.
Sec. 2. 21-A MRSA §122, sub-§4, as amended by PL 2005, c. 453, §16, is repealed.
Sec. 3. 21-A MRSA §122, sub-§5, as amended by PL 2013, c. 131, §7, is further
amended to read:
5. Alternative registration schedule for absentee voters. If the clerk receives a
properly completed absentee ballot application that is signed by a person who is not a
registered voter in the municipality, a presumption of the person's qualification as a voter
is established. The clerk shall send an absentee ballot to the voter at the address indicated,
along with a voter registration application under section 152. The completed registration
application must be returned to the clerk by the close of the polls on business on the last
Thursday before election day in order for the ballot to be counted and may not be sealed
with the voted absentee ballot. If the application is received during the closed period and
the registrar is not satisfied as to the person's qualification as a voter, the registrar shall
follow the requirements of section 121, subsection 1‑A to place the person's name on the
incoming voting list and challenge the absentee ballot. An application by telephone under
section 753‑A, subsection 4 or an application by electronic means under section 753‑A,
subsection 6 does not establish a presumption of qualification under this section and the
requestor must submit a properly completed voter registration application before the clerk
may issue an absentee ballot.
Sec. 4. 21-A MRSA §122, sub-§6, ¶A, as amended by PL 2005, c. 453, §18, is
further amended by amending subparagraph (1) to read:
(1) In a municipality with a population of 2,500 or fewer, on the last business day
Thursday that the clerk's office is open before election day during the hours that
the clerk's office is open;
Sec. 5. 21-A MRSA §122, sub-§6, ¶A, as amended by PL 2005, c. 453, §18, is
further amended by amending subparagraph (2) to read:
(2) In a municipality with a population of more than 2,500, on the last 5 business
days Thursday that the clerk's office is open before election day, and for the 4
business days prior to the last Thursday before election day, during the hours that
the clerk's office is open and for 2 hours in the evening between 5 p.m. and 9 p.m.
on at least one of these days; and
Page 1 - 132LR0449(01)

Sec. 6. 21-A MRSA §122, sub-§9, as amended by PL 2003, c. 395, §1, is further
amended to read:
9. Regulation of registration monitors. Anyone who wishes to monitor the names
and addresses of persons who are registering at the registrar's office or the clerk's office
shall inform the registrar or clerk of that intent. Anyone who wishes to monitor the names
and addresses of persons who are registering at the polling place shall inform the registrar
or clerk of that intent by submitting a written, signed statement containing the proposed
monitor's name, address and intent. The registrar or clerk may designate a place where a
person monitoring registrations may stand. The registrar or clerk shall then announce the
name and address of individuals registering to vote in a loud and clear voice. A person
monitoring registrations shall direct any questions the person has to the registrar or clerk.
These questions must be limited to information pertinent to the qualifications of an
individual to register. A person monitoring registrations may not ask questions of
individuals waiting to register concerning their eligibility to vote. A polling place
registration monitor may not handle or inspect registration cards, files or other materials
used by the registrar or clerk except as provided in section 22. A monitor may not inhibit
the work of the registrar or clerk. If the work of a registrar or clerk appears to be inhibited,
the warden may request a reduction in the number of monitors present in the polling place.
A registrar or clerk may require a person monitoring registrations who violates the
provisions of this subsection to leave the building.